Utah statutes.
32B-1-305.   Requirement for a criminal background check.

(1)  The department shall require an individual listed in Subsection (2) to, in accordance with this part:

(a)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the department; and

(b)  consent to a fingerprint criminal background check by:

(i)  the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification; and

(ii)  the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(2)  The following shall comply with Subsection (1):

(a)  an individual applying for employment with the department if:

(i)  the department makes the decision to offer the individual employment with the department; and

(ii)  once employed, the individual will receive benefits;

(b)  an individual applying to the commission to operate a package agency;

(c)  an individual applying to the commission for a license;

(d)  an individual who with regard to an entity that is applying to the commission to operate a package agency or for a license is:

(i)  a partner;

(ii)  a managing agent;

(iii)  a manager;

(iv)  an officer;

(v)  a director;

(vi)  a stockholder who holds at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of a corporation;

(vii)  a member who owns at least 20% of a limited liability company; or

(viii)  an individual employed to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity; or

(e)  an individual who becomes involved with an entity that operates a package agency or holds a license, if the individual is in a capacity listed in Subsection (2)(d) on or after the day on which the entity:

(i)  is approved to operate a package agency; or

(ii)  is licensed by the commission.

(3)  The department shall require compliance with Subsection (2)(e) as a condition of an entity's:

(a)  continued operation of a package agency; or

(b)  renewal of a license.

(4)  The department may require as a condition of continued employment that a department employee:

(a)  submit a fingerprint card in a form acceptable to the department; and

(b)  consent to a fingerprint criminal background check by:

(i)  the Utah Bureau of Criminal Identification; and

(ii)  the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

